Montana, session 2025, HB760.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 and 2], unless the context clearly indicates otherwise,
the following definitions apply:
(1) "Solar buyer" means a person or entity who purchases or considers to purchase a solar energy
system located on a residential property that is owned or leased.
(2) "Solar energy system" means an assembly of equipment and components that has the primary
purpose of converting sunlight into electricity by photovoltaic effect for a resident's use for personal, family, or
household purposes. The term includes battery storage.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 760
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 760
(3) "Solar sales agent" means a person or entity that solicits, offers, negotiates, sells, or executes
contracts via door-to-door sales to sell a solar energy system at the direction of, or on behalf of, a solar
company.
Section 2. Solar buyer's right to cancel -- prohibition of deceptive statements. (1) A solar sales
agent shall provide a customer with an explanation of the customer's recission rights written in all capital letters
that includes space for the customer to initial a written acknowledgement of having read and understood the
explanation that reads as follows:
"YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO CANCEL THIS CONTRACT WITHIN 3 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER YOU
SIGN THIS CONTRACT. TO CANCEL, YOU MUST NOTIFY IN WRITING THE PERSON IDENTIFIED FOR
THIS PURPOSE IN THIS CONTRACT BY E-MAIL OR BY CERTIFIED POSTAL MAIL".
(2) (a) If a solar buyer rescinds an installation contract with a solar company or a solar sales agent
representing a solar company within 3 business days following the date on which the solar buyer signed an
agreement to purchase and provides their cancellation notice in writing to the solar company or the solar sales
agent representing a solar company, the contract is terminated.
(b) A solar company or a solar sales agent representing a solar company may not enforce any
terms of the rescinded contract and may not file any claims for labor and materials.
(3) A solar company or a solar sales agent representing a solar company may not conduct
solicitations using any deceptive statement concerning the costs, financing, and terms and conditions of the
purchase or installation of a solar energy system.
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified as an integral
part of Title 30, chapter 14, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 14, apply to [sections 1 and 2].
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 760
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 760, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 760
INTRODUCED BY G. NIKOLAKAKOS, E. KERR-CARPENTER
AN ACT ESTABLISHING SOLAR CONSUMER PROTECTION LAWS; PROVIDING A SOLAR BUYER'S
RIGHT TO CANCEL; PROVIDING TIMELINES; PROVIDING DEFINITIONS; AND PROVIDING AN
IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.